District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.05

Inspection and investigation.

The Mayor is authorized to conduct an on-site inspection of any asbestos abatement project to determine compliance with all federal and District laws or rules applicable to asbestos abatement. The Mayor is authorized to investigate any report of noncompliance with the federal and District laws or rules applicable to asbestos abatement.

History

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 6, 37 DCR 1641

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-991.5.